District of Columbia statutes.
31-3004

Applicability.

(a)

The requirements of this chapter shall apply to all health benefit plans issued, delivered, renewed, or reissued on the 91st day after October 21, 2000.

(b)

All health benefit plans other than the health benefit plans specified in subsection (a) of this section shall comply with the requirements of this chapter within 180 days after the date specified in subsection (a) of this section.

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-175, § 5, 47 DCR 6832